Alaska, session 34, SB103.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 08.68.331 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 04 (c) Regulations adopted under (a)(1) of this section establishing standards for 05 a certified nurse aide training program must require that the program 06 (1) be conducted in a manner to ensure that clients receive safe and 07 competent care; and 08 (2) train a certified nurse aide to 09 (A) form a relationship, communicate, and interact competently 10 with a client; 11 (B) demonstrate sensitivity to the emotional, social, and mental 12 health needs of a client through skillful and directed interactions; 13 (C) assist a client in reaching and maintaining independence; 14 (D) support and promote the rights of a client; 15 (E) demonstrate the skills of observing and monitoring a client 01 during caregiving, as well as reporting those observations to enable the 02 assessment of the health, physical condition, and well-being of a client; 03 (F) demonstrate knowledge of the abilities and care needs of a 04 client; 05 (G) use a problem-solving approach when providing care; 06 (H) use techniques that ensure and preserve the respect, values, 07 choices, and dignity of a client; 08 (I) demonstrate knowledge of client assessment and care 09 planning best practices; 10 (J) use effective communication skills, including while 11 communicating with a client with psychosocial needs or Alzheimer's disease, 12 dementia, a mental illness, an intellectual disability, or another cognitive 13 disability or impairment; 14 (K) provide care to a client who is cognitively impaired or has 15 a decline in cognitive function related to dementia; and 16 (L) demonstrate basic knowledge of Alzheimer's disease, 17 dementia, dementia-related behaviors, and the activities of daily living; in this 18 subparagraph, "activities of daily living" means eating, dressing, grooming, 19 bathing, and toileting. 20 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.